Utah statutes.
11-13-203.5.   Powers, immunities, and privileges of law enforcement
officers under an agreement for law enforcement -- Requirements for out-of-
state officers.
(1)  While performing duties under an agreement for law enforcement services
under Subsection 11-13-202(1)(d), whether inside or outside the law
enforcement officer's own jurisdiction, each law enforcement officer shall
possess:
(a)  all law enforcement powers that the officer possesses within the
officer's own jurisdiction, including the power to arrest; and
(b)  the same immunities and privileges as if the duties were performed within
the officer's own jurisdiction.
(2)  Each agreement between a Utah public agency and an out-of-state public
agency under Subsection 11-13-202(1)(d) providing for reciprocal law
enforcement services shall require each person from the other state assigned
to law enforcement duty in this state:
(a)  to be certified as a peace officer in the state of the out-of-state
public agency; and
(b)  to apply to the Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, created in
Section 53-6-106, for recognition before undertaking duties in this state
under the agreement.
